Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5740XC (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 237.5A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 237.5A Foster parent training. 3 1. a. As a condition for initial licensure, each proposed 4 individual licensee shall complete thirty hours of foster 5 parent training offered or approved by the department. 6 However, if When determining the appropriate foster parent 7 training for a proposed individual licensee, the department 8 shall consider the proposed individual licensee has completed 9 relevant training or has a combination of completed licenseeâs 10 relevant training and experience , and the department deems such 11 training or combination to be an acceptable equivalent to all 12 or a portion of the initial licensure training requirement, or 13 based upon the . In addition, the department shall consider the 14 circumstances of the child who will receive child foster care 15 from the proposed individual licensee and the circumstances of 16 the proposed individual licensee the department finds there is 17 other good cause, the department may waive all or a portion of 18 the training requirement . 19 b. Prior to renewal of licensure, each individual licensee 20 shall annually complete six hours of foster parent training 21 as determined appropriate for the individual licensee by the 22 department . The training 23 2. Training required under this section shall include but is 24 not limited to physical care, education, learning disabilities, 25 referral to and receipt of necessary professional services, 26 behavioral assessment and modification, self-assessment, 27 self-living skills, and biological parent contact. An 28 individual licensee not be limited to all of the following: 29 a. An overview of child welfare. 30 b. Biological parent contact and supporting a childâs family 31 of origin. 32 c. Behavior management. 33 d. Trauma and the effect on child development. 34 e. Attachment, grief, and loss. 35 -1- LSB 5740XC (2) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 S.F. _____ 3. A person may complete the training required under this 1 section as part of an approved training program offered by a 2 public or private agency with expertise in the provision of 3 child foster care or in related subject areas. The department 4 shall adopt rules to implement and enforce this training 5 requirement. 6 2. 4. An individual licensee who is unable to complete six 7 hours of foster parent training annually prior to licensure 8 renewal required under subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , because the 9 individual licensee is engaged in active duty in the military 10 service shall be considered to be in compliance with the 11 training requirement for licensure renewal. 12 3. 5. The department or the departmentâs agent shall 13 notify an individual licensee within a reasonable amount of 14 time of any training the department believes would benefit the 15 individual licensee in the provision of child foster care. 16 6. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 17 to implement and enforce this section. 18